indomorph/hin/misc.lexc
!!!misc.lexc for Hindi!!!
!!!These categories don't inflect!!!
Multichar_Symbols
!Morphological properties
+Adv +Adp +Conj +Prt +Num +Pron

LEXICON Root
0:0 Adverb ;
0:0 Adposition ;
0:0 Conjunction ;
0:0 Particle ;
0:0 Number ;
0:0 Pronoun ;

LEXICON AdvPOS
+Adv:0 # ;

LEXICON AdpPOS
+Adp:0 # ;

LEXICON ConjPOS
+Conj:0 # ;

LEXICON Particle
अलविदा PartPOS ; ! /alvidaː/ adieu
अहो PartPOS ; ! /aɦo/ heigh
आओ PartPOS ; ! /aːo/ come
आदाब PartPOS ; ! /aːdaːb/ cheerio
आरे PartPOS ; ! /aːre/ LO, Roger
ख़बरदार PartPOS ; ! /xəbrədaːr/ vide, take care
ख़ाक PartPOS ; ! /xaːk/ nothing of the kind
ग़ज़ब PartPOS ; ! /ɣəzəb/ perfect
छोड़ PartPOS ; ! /t͡ʃʰoɽ/ leave
जय PartPOS ; ! /d͡ʒəj/ viva
जरूर PartPOS ; ! /d͡ʒəruːr/ of course, sure
जा PartPOS ; ! /d͡ʒaː/ go
ज़िंदाबाद PartPOS ; ! /zindaːbaːd/ viva
दे PartPOS ; ! /de/ give
देखिये PartPOS ; ! /dekʰije/ vide
बंदगी PartPOS ; ! /bəndɡiː/ cheerio
भला PartPOS ; ! /b̤əlaː/ okey, OK
रुक PartPOS ; ! /ruk/ stop
रे PartPOS ; ! /re/ HA, sirrah
लो PartPOS ; ! /lo/ take, heigh
वाह PartPOS ; ! /vaːɦ/ hey, boh
शाबाश PartPOS ; ! /ʃaːbaːʃ/ well done, okey
शुभकामनाएं PartPOS ; ! /ʃub̤kaːmnaːen/ best wishes
हट PartPOS ; ! /ɦəʈ/ move, hence
हाय PartPOS ; ! /ɦaːj/ HI

LEXICON PartPOS
+Part:0 # ;

LEXICON Number
सिफर # ; ! /sipʰər/ nought
सुन्ना # ; ! /sunnaː/ zero

LEXICON PronPOS
+Pron:0 # ;

LEXICON Adverb
अगरचे AdvPOS ; ! /aɡrət͡ʃe/ albeit, though
अत्यधिक AdvPOS ; ! /atjəd̤ik/ shatteringly, staggeringly
अधिकारपूर्वक AdvPOS ; ! /ad̤ikaːrpuːrvək/ authoritatively
अनसोचे AdvPOS ; ! /ansot͡ʃe/ thoughtlessly
अन्धाधुन्ध AdvPOS ; ! /and̤aːd̤und̤ə/ headlong
अप्रतिम AdvPOS ; ! /aprətim/ without parallel
अर्द्धवार्षिक AdvPOS ; ! /ardd̤əvaːrʂik/ biannually
अश्रुपूरित AdvPOS ; ! /aʃrupuːrit/ tearfully
अंदाजन AdvPOS ; ! /ndaːd͡ʒən/ tentatively
आज AdvPOS ; ! /aːd͡ʒ/ today
आदेशानुसार AdvPOS ; ! /aːdeʃaːnusaːr/ by order, at <somebody> behest
आसपास AdvPOS ; ! /aːspaːs/ hereabouts, close
इन् AdvPOS ; ! /in/ in
उतना AdvPOS ; ! /utnaː/ so much, insomuch
उपर्युक्त AdvPOS ; ! /uprjuktə/ supra
उसमें AdvPOS ; ! /usmen/ therein
एकदम AdvPOS ; ! /ekdəm/ clean, plum
ऐसे AdvPOS ; ! /æːse/ so
कदाचित AdvPOS ; ! /kədaːt͡ʃit/ seldom, seemingly
क़रीब AdvPOS ; ! /qəriːb/ near
क़ानूनन AdvPOS ; ! /qaːnuːnən/ legally
किंचित AdvPOS ; ! /kiɲt͡ʃit/ somewhat
केवल AdvPOS ; ! /kevəl/ just, scarcely
क्रूरतापूर्वक AdvPOS ; ! /kruːrtaːpuːrvək/ inhumanely, cruelly
गहरा AdvPOS ; ! /ɡəɦraː/ deep, deeply
चुपचाप AdvPOS ; ! /t͡ʃupt͡ʃaːp/ quiety, silently
जल्द AdvPOS ; ! /d͡ʒəldə/ pronto, facilely
ज़्यादातर AdvPOS ; ! /zjaːdaːtər/ principally, chiefly
डटकर AdvPOS ; ! /ɖəʈkər/ unhesitatingly, hardily
तदापि AdvPOS ; ! /tədaːpi/ yet
तीसरे AdvPOS ; ! /tiːsre/ thirdly
दीनतापूर्वक AdvPOS ; ! /diːntaːpuːrvək/ abjectly
दौड़कर AdvPOS ; ! /dɔːɽkər/ at the double, on the double
नित AdvPOS ; ! /nit/ eternally
निष्ठुरतापूर्वक AdvPOS ; ! /niʂʈʰurtaːpuːrvək/ unfeelingly, mercilessly
परस्पर AdvPOS ; ! /pərspər/ mutually
पीछे AdvPOS ; ! /piːt͡ʃʰe/ behind, after
प्रतिक्षण AdvPOS ; ! /prətikʂəɳ/ minutely
प्राणघातक AdvPOS ; ! /praːɳɡ̤aːtək/ mortally
बख़ूबी AdvPOS ; ! /bəxuːbiː/ fine, first-rate
बहुधा AdvPOS ; ! /bəɦud̤aː/ chiefly, as usual
बीचोबीच AdvPOS ; ! /biːt͡ʃobiːt͡ʃ/ midmost
बेशक AdvPOS ; ! /beʃək/ naturally, admittedly
भी AdvPOS ; ! /b̤iː/ also, and all
मूर्खतावश AdvPOS ; ! /muːrkʰətaːvəʃ/ stupidly
यहां AdvPOS ; ! /jəɦaːn/ here, Here
लगभग AdvPOS ; ! /ləɡb̤əɡ/ nearly, something like
वहीं AdvPOS ; ! /vəɦiːn/ ibidem
वीरतापूर्वक AdvPOS ; ! /viːrtaːpuːrvək/ valorously, valiantly
श्रद्धापूर्वक AdvPOS ; ! /ʃrədd̤aːpuːrvək/ faithfully, devoutly
समूचा AdvPOS ; ! /səmuːt͡ʃaː/ all
सस्ते AdvPOS ; ! /səste/ inexpensively
सारतः AdvPOS ; ! /saːrtəh/ essentially
सुनकर AdvPOS ; ! /sunkər/ by the sound of it
स्पष्टतया AdvPOS ; ! /spəʂʈətjaː/ explicitly, barely
हमेसा AdvPOS ; ! /ɦəmesaː/ ever
LEXICON Adposition
अन्दर AdpPOS ; ! /andər/ under
अलग AdpPOS ; ! /aləɡ/ beside
उपर AdpPOS ; ! /upər/ into
उपरान्त AdpPOS ; ! /upraːntə/ since
ओर AdpPOS ; ! /or/ on
और AdpPOS ; ! /ɔːr/ plus
का AdpPOS ; ! /kaː/ of
किंतु AdpPOS ; ! /kintu/ but
की AdpPOS ; ! /kiː/ of
के AdpPOS ; ! /ke/ from
को AdpPOS ; ! /ko/ on
जगह AdpPOS ; ! /d͡ʒəɡəɦ/ in <somebody> place
तक AdpPOS ; ! /tək/ up to <something>, up until <something>
तरफ AdpPOS ; ! /tərəpʰ/ towards
दरमियान AdpPOS ; ! /dərmijaːn/ on
दौरान AdpPOS ; ! /dɔːraːn/ during
द्वारा AdpPOS ; ! /dvaːraː/ by
धन AdpPOS ; ! /d̤ən/ plus
न AdpPOS ; ! /nə/ without
नजदीक AdpPOS ; ! /nəd͡ʒdiːk/ upon
निमित्त AdpPOS ; ! /nimittə/ against
पर AdpPOS ; ! /pər/ at, down
परंतु AdpPOS ; ! /pərəntu/ but
पर्यंत AdpPOS ; ! /pərjəntə/ during
पे AdpPOS ; ! /pe/ on
प्रति AdpPOS ; ! /prəti/ in, per
प्रतिकूल AdpPOS ; ! /prətikuːl/ unlike
बगैर AdpPOS ; ! /bəɡæːr/ without
बढ़कर AdpPOS ; ! /bəɽ̥əkər/ above
बतौर AdpPOS ; ! /bətɔːr/ as
बनाम AdpPOS ; ! /bənaːm/ versus
बाबत AdpPOS ; ! /baːbət/ of
बावजूद AdpPOS ; ! /baːvd͡ʒuːd/ despite
बिना AdpPOS ; ! /binaː/ without
भी AdpPOS ; ! /b̤iː/ to boot, boot
मगर AdpPOS ; ! /məɡər/ but
मान्य AdpPOS ; ! /maːnjə/ in order
मिलकर AdpPOS ; ! /milkər/ among
मिलाकर AdpPOS ; ! /milaːkər/ with
में AdpPOS ; ! /men/ on, in
लिए AdpPOS ; ! /lie/ in favor of
लिये AdpPOS ; ! /lije/ against, on
लेकर AdpPOS ; ! /lekər/ with
वाला AdpPOS ; ! /vaːlaː/ with
वास्ते AdpPOS ; ! /vaːste/ of, FOR
विरुद्ध AdpPOS ; ! /virudd̤ə/ versus
वैसा AdpPOS ; ! /væːsaː/ like
शीघ्र AdpPOS ; ! /ʃiːɡ̤rə/ ere
समीप AdpPOS ; ! /səmiːp/ beside
सम्मुख AdpPOS ; ! /səmmukʰ/ against
सहित AdpPOS ; ! /səɦit/ including
साढ़े AdpPOS ; ! /saːɽ̥e/ half
स् AdpPOS ; ! /s/ out of, at <somebody> hands
LEXICON Conjunction
अगरचे ConjPOS ; ! /aɡrət͡ʃe/ notwithstanding
अतएव ConjPOS ; ! /atəev/ so
अतः ConjPOS ; ! /atəh/ because, then
अथवा ConjPOS ; ! /atʰvaː/ or
अन्यथा ConjPOS ; ! /anjətʰaː/ or, otherwise
अभी ConjPOS ; ! /ab̤iː/ now
अर्थात ConjPOS ; ! /artʰaːt/ because
इसलिए ConjPOS ; ! /islie/ because
इसलिये ConjPOS ; ! /islije/ then
ऊर्फ ConjPOS ; ! /uːrpʰə/ alias
एवं ConjPOS ; ! /evən/ and
और ConjPOS ; ! /ɔːr/ and
काश ConjPOS ; ! /kaːʃ/ if only
कि ConjPOS ; ! /ki/ whether, if
किन्तु ConjPOS ; ! /kintu/ but
किंतु ConjPOS ; ! /kintu/ but
की ConjPOS ; ! /kiː/ HOW
कैसे ConjPOS ; ! /kæːse/ how
क्या ConjPOS ; ! /kjaː/ what
क्योंकि ConjPOS ; ! /kjoŋki/ when, as
चाहे ConjPOS ; ! /t͡ʃaːɦe/ or, even if
चूंकि ConjPOS ; ! /t͡ʃuːŋki/ since, because
चूँकि ConjPOS ; ! /t͡ʃũːki/ when, whereas
जब ConjPOS ; ! /d͡ʒəb/ as, while
जबकि ConjPOS ; ! /d͡ʒəbki/ whereas
जबतक ConjPOS ; ! /d͡ʒəbtək/ as long as
जहाँ ConjPOS ; ! /d͡ʒəɦãː/ where
जिससे ConjPOS ; ! /d͡ʒisse/ so
जैसा ConjPOS ; ! /d͡ʒæːsaː/ as
जैसे ConjPOS ; ! /d͡ʒæːse/ as it were
जो ConjPOS ; ! /d͡ʒo/ which, although
जोकि ConjPOS ; ! /d͡ʒoki/ which
ज्योंहि ConjPOS ; ! /d͡ʒjonɦi/ as
तथा ConjPOS ; ! /tətʰaː/ and
तथापि ConjPOS ; ! /tətʰaːpi/ nevertheless
तदनन्तर ConjPOS ; ! /tədnəntər/ whereupon
ताकि ConjPOS ; ! /taːki/ in order that, because
तुरन्त ConjPOS ; ! /turntə/ directly
तो ConjPOS ; ! /to/ then
पर ConjPOS ; ! /pər/ but
परन्तु ConjPOS ; ! /pərntu/ but
फिर ConjPOS ; ! /pʰir/ then
फ़ौरन ConjPOS ; ! /fɔːrən/ immediately
बल्कि ConjPOS ; ! /bəlki/ but rather
बावजूद ConjPOS ; ! /baːvd͡ʒuːd/ besides it, inspite of
भी ConjPOS ; ! /b̤iː/ too
मगर ConjPOS ; ! /məɡər/ but, though
मानकर ConjPOS ; ! /maːnkər/ assuming
मानो ConjPOS ; ! /maːno/ as though, that
यदि ConjPOS ; ! /jədi/ if only, if
या ConjPOS ; ! /jaː/ or, either
याने ConjPOS ; ! /jaːne/ that
लेकिन ConjPOS ; ! /lekin/ but
वरना ConjPOS ; ! /vərnaː/ otherwise
वा ConjPOS ; ! /vaː/ or
हलांकि ConjPOS ; ! /ɦəlaːŋki/ though
LEXICON Pronoun
अधिक PronPOS ; ! /ad̤ik/ a lot, much
अधिकतम PronPOS ; ! /ad̤iktəm/ most
अपना PronPOS ; ! /apnaː/ own
अपनेआप PronPOS ; ! /apneaːp/ yourself
आप PronPOS ; ! /aːp/ you
कइयों PronPOS ; ! /kəijon/ many
कई PronPOS ; ! /kəi/ good few, several
कहाँ PronPOS ; ! /kəɦãː/ somewhere
कहीं PronPOS ; ! /kəɦiːn/ somewhere
काफ़ी PronPOS ; ! /kaːfiː/ enough
किनका PronPOS ; ! /kinkaː/ whose
किनके PronPOS ; ! /kinke/ who
किन्हें PronPOS ; ! /kinɦen/ whom
किस PronPOS ; ! /kis/ whom
किसका PronPOS ; ! /kiskaː/ whose
किसके PronPOS ; ! /kiske/ who
किसको PronPOS ; ! /kisko/ who, whom
किसने PronPOS ; ! /kisne/ who
किसी PronPOS ; ! /kisiː/ somebody, someone
किसे PronPOS ; ! /kise/ whom
कुछ PronPOS ; ! /kut͡ʃʰ/ anything, some
कोई PronPOS ; ! /koiː/ someone, somebody
कोष्टक PronPOS ; ! /koʂʈək/ table
कौन PronPOS ; ! /kɔːn/ whoever, who
कंहा PronPOS ; ! /kənɦaː/ where
क्या PronPOS ; ! /kjaː/ what, if
खुद PronPOS ; ! /kʰud/ oneself, themselves
ख़ुद PronPOS ; ! /xud/ himself, yourself
चौथा PronPOS ; ! /t͡ʃɔːtʰaː/ fourth
ज़रा PronPOS ; ! /zəraː/ some
जि PronPOS ; ! /d͡ʒi/ which, that
जिन्हें PronPOS ; ! /d͡ʒinɦen/ which
जिसका PronPOS ; ! /d͡ʒiskaː/ which
जो PronPOS ; ! /d͡ʒo/ who, that
ज्यादा PronPOS ; ! /d͡ʒjaːdaː/ much, many
तब PronPOS ; ! /təb/ when
थोड़ा PronPOS ; ! /tʰoɽaː/ little
दूसरा PronPOS ; ! /duːsraː/ another
दोनों PronPOS ; ! /donon/ both
नग PronPOS ; ! /nəɡ/ pieces
निजी PronPOS ; ! /nid͡ʒiː/ own
पहला PronPOS ; ! /pəɦlaː/ the former
पूर्वकथित PronPOS ; ! /puːrvəktʰit/ Same
प्रत्येक PronPOS ; ! /prətjek/ everything, everybody
बहुत PronPOS ; ! /bəɦut/ many, plenty
बहुतों PronPOS ; ! /bəɦuton/ many
बिलकुल PronPOS ; ! /bilkul/ any
यदि PronPOS ; ! /jədi/ if
ये PronPOS ; ! /je/ these
वही PronPOS ; ! /vəɦiː/ that
वो PronPOS ; ! /vo/ those, they
सबकुछ PronPOS ; ! /səbkut͡ʃʰ/ the be-all and end-all, evrything
सारा PronPOS ; ! /saːraː/ everything
स्वयं PronPOS ; ! /svəjən/ itself, herself
हरएक PronPOS ; ! /ɦərəek/ each
